Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1306
Director of Personnel; employees.

The Director of Personnel shall employ the necessary personnel to carry out the duties of the personnel division subject to the amount of funds appropriated for such purpose.

Laws 1967, c. 573, § 6, p. 1890;

Laws 1969, c. 802, § 5, p. 3022;

Laws 1971, LB 1030, § 5;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 14.